bg-BG: Включени подаръци за бебета: Лигавници; Одеяло; Книги; Кърпи за оригване; Облекло; Шапки; Дрънкалки; Чорапи; Гризалки; Играчки; Кърпи за миене; Други
lt-LT: Komplekte esančios dovanos kūdikiui: Seilinukai; Antklodė; Knygos; Merliukai; Drabužiai; Kepurės; Barškučiai; Kojinės; Kramtukai; Žaislai; Medžiaginės kempinės; Kita
ro-RO: Cadouri pentru bebeluși incluse: Bavete; Pătură; Cărți; Museline pentru bebeluși; Îmbrăcăminte; Căciuli; Sunători; Șosete; Jucării pentru dentiție; Jucării; Lavete; Altele
pt-BR: Itens de presente para bebê incluídos: Babadores; Cobertor; Livros; Panos de ombro; Roupas; Chapéus; Chocalhos; Meias; Mordedores; Brinquedos; Toalhinhas de lavabo; Outro
nb: Inkluderte babygaveartikler: Smekker; Teppe; Bøker; Rapekluter; Klesplagg; Hatter; Rangler; Sokker; Biteleker; Leker; Vaskekluter; Annen
hu: A tartalmazott babaajándék-cikkek: Előke; Takaró; Könyvek; Büfikendők; Ruhafélék; Kalapok; Csörgők; Zoknik; Rágókák; Játékok; Mosókendők; Egyéb
fr: Articles cadeaux pour bébé inclus: Bavoirs; Couverture; Livres; Protège-épaules; Vêtements; Chapeaux; Hochets; Chaussettes; Anneaux de dentition; Jouets; Gants de toilette; Autre
zh-TW: 嬰兒禮品含有品項: 圍兜; 毯子; 書籍; 拍嗝巾; 衣著; 帽子; 寶寶音效玩具; 襪子; 固齒器; 玩具; 洗臉毛巾; 其他
fi: Mukana vauvojen lahjatavaroita: Tutit; Huopa; Kirjat; Harsot; Vaatteet; Hatut; Helistimet; Sukat; Purulelut; Lelut; Pesuliinat; Muu
sl-SI: Priložena darila za dojenčke: Slinček; Odeja; Knjige; Krpe za podiranje kupčka; Oblačila; Klobučki; Ropotulje; Nogavice; Grizala; Igrače; Krpice za umivanje; Drugi
cs: Obsažené položky dárkové sady pro děti: Dětské bryndáky; Deka; Knihy; Hadříky na odříhnutí; Oblečení; Klobouky; Chrastítka; Ponožky; Kousátka; Hračky; Žínky; Jiné
ko: 출산 선물 품목 포함: 턱받이; 담요; 도서; 트림 수건; 의류; 모자; 딸랑이; 양말; 치발기; 장난감; 세안 타월; 기타
it: Articoli regalo per bambini inclusi: Bavaglini; Coperta; Libri; Panni antirigurgito; Abbigliamento; Cappelli; Sonagli; Calzini; Massaggiagengive; Giocattoli; Salviette; Altro
nl: Inclusief babycadeauartikelen: Slabbetjes; Deken; Boeken; Spuugdoekjes; Kleding; Hoeden; Rammelaar; Sokken; Bijtringen; Speelgoed; Washandjes; Andere
pl: W zestawie upominki dla dziecka: Śliniaki; Z funkcją koca; Książki; Ściereczki do bekania; Odzież; Kapelusze; Grzechotki; Skarpety; Gryzaki; Zabawki; Ściereczki do prania; Pozostałe
da: Babygaveartikler inkluderet: Savlesmække; Tæppe; Bøger; Bøvseklude; Tøj; Hatte; Rangler; Sokker; Bideringe; Legetøj; Vaskeklude; Andet
zh-CN: 包括婴儿礼品: 围嘴; 毛毯式围巾; 书; 口水巾/打嗝垫布; 服装; 帽子; 摇铃; 袜子; 牙胶; 玩具; 洗脸巾; 其他
hr-HR: Artikli u poklon paketu za bebe: Podbradnik; Dekica; Knjige; Krpe za podrigivanje; Odjeća; Kapice; Zvečke; Čarape; Grickalice; Igračke; Krpice za pranje; Ostalo
vi: Bao gồm các vật dụng cho bé: Yếm; Chăn; Sách; Khăn trớ; Quần áo; Mũ nón; Cái lúc lắc; Tất; Ngậm nướu; Đồ chơi; Khăn mặt; Khác
th: รวมรายการของขวัญเด็กทารก: ผ้ากันเปื้อน; Blanket; หนังสือ; ผ้าพาดบ่าสำหรับอุ้มเด็ก; เสื้อผ้า; หมวก; ของเล่นเขย่า; ถุงเท้า; ยางกัด; ของเล่น; ผ้าเช็ดตัว; อื่นๆ
es: Artículos de regalo para bebé incluidos: Baberos; Manta; Libros; Baberos para eructos; Prendas de vestir; Sombreros; Sonajeros; Calcetines; Mordedores; Juguetes; Toallitas; Otros
sv: Babypresentartiklar ingår: Haklappar; Filt; Böcker; Kräklappar; Klädsel; Hattar; Skallror; Strumpor; Bitringar; Leksaker; Tvättlappar; Annat
ru: Состав набора подарков для младенцев: Слюнявчик; Одеяло; Книги; Салфетки для срыгивания; Одежда; Головные уборы; Погремушки; Носки; Зубные кольца; Игрушки; Махровые салфетки; Другое
el: Περιλαμβάνονται βρεφικά είδη δώρου: Σαλιάρα; Κουβέρτα; Βιβλία; Πανάκια ώμου; Ενδύματα; Καπέλα; Κουδουνίστρες; Κάλτσες; Δακτύλιοι οδοντοφυΐας; Παιχνίδια; Πετσέτες; Άλλο
sk-SK: Darčekové predmety pre bábätká v cene: Podbradníky; Deka; Knihy; Obliečky na odgrgnutie; Oblečenie; Klobúky; Hrkálky; Ponožky; Hryzadlá; Hračky; Žinky; Iné
de: Inbegriffene Baby-Geschenkartikel: Lätzchen; Decke; Bücher; Baby-Spucktücher; Bekleidung; Hüte; Babyrasseln; Socken; Beißringe; Spielzeuge; Waschlappen; Sonstiges
tr: Bebekler için hediyelik ürünler dahil: Mama Önlükleri; Battaniye; Kitaplar; Gaz çıkarma bezleri; Giyim Eşyaları; Şapkalar; Çıngıraklar; Çoraplar; Diş Kaşıyıcılar; Oyuncaklar; Sabunluklar; Diğer
pt-PT: Itens de oferta para bebé incluídos: Babetes; Cobertor; Livros; Panos para refluxo; Vestuário; Chapéus; Rocas; Meias; Mordedores; Brinquedos; Toalhas de rosto; Outro
en: Baby gift items included: Bibs; Blanket; Books; Burp cloths; Clothing; Hats; Rattles; Socks; Teethers; Toys; Washcloths; Other
ja: ベビーギフトのアイテム (詳細): よだれかけ; 毛布; 書籍; 授乳用肩掛け; 衣料品; 帽子; がらがら; 靴下; はがため; おもちゃ; ボディタオル; その他